Utah statutes.
63G-6-906.   Resolving controversy arising under a cooperative purchasing agreement.

Under a cooperative purchasing agreement, controversies arising between an administering state public procurement unit and its bidders, offerors, or contractors shall be resolved in accordance with Part 8, Legal and Contractual Remedies.

